Maryland, session 2026, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1310*

HOUSE BILL 1310
7–213.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PARENT” INCLUDES A STEPPARENT AND GUARDIAN.
(3) “SIBLING” INCLUDES A STEPSIBLING.
(4) “TRAUMATIC LOSS” MEANS THE DEATH OF A PARENT OR SIBLING
AS A RESULT OF REPRODUCTIVE CANCER, INCLUDING BREAST CANCER, CERVICAL
CANCER, AND UTERINE CANCER.
(B) A STUDENT WHO EXPERIENCES A TRAUMATIC LOSS WHILE ENROLLED
IN HIGH SCHOOL MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
TO INCLUDE A TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION ON THE STUDENT’S OFFICIAL
TRANSCRIPT TO INDICATE AN IMPACT ON THE STUDENT’S ACADEMIC
PERFORMANCE, ACHIEVEMENT, OR ATTENDANCE.
(C) A STUDENT IS ELIGIBLE TO REQUEST A TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION ON
THE STUDENT’S OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT IF THE STUDENT SUBMITS TO THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM:
(1) A REQUEST TO INCLUDE A TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION ON THE
FORM PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(2) (I) A COPY OF THE PARENT’S DEATH CERTIFICATE OF THE
PARENT OR SIBLING LISTING A CAUSE OF DEATH THAT QUALIFIES AS A TRAUMATIC
LOSS; OR
(II) A LETTER FROM A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
VERIFYING THAT THE PARENT’S CAUSE OF DEATH QUALIFIES AS A TRAUMATIC LOSS.
(D) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FROM A STUDENT ELIGIBLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL PRINT A
TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION ON THE STUDENT’S OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT USING THE
STANDARD LANGUAGE DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL REMOVE A TRAUMATIC LOSS
NOTATION FROM A STUDENT’S OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT AT THE WRITTEN REQUEST OF
THE STUDENT.

HOUSE BILL 1310 3
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP STANDARD LANGUAGE FOR A
TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION PRINTED ON AN OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT BY A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) TO MAINTAIN STUDENT PRIVACY, THE STANDARD LANGUAGE
DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL REFER TO THE TRAUMATIC LOSS AS
EITHER:
(I) A DOCUMENTED COMPELLING PERSONAL CIRCUMSTANCE;
OR
(II) AN EXCEPTIONAL HARDSHIP ACKNOWLEDGEMENT.
(3) A TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION:
(I) SHALL STATE THE SCHOOL YEAR OR YEARS THE STUDENT
WAS IMPACTED BY AND SEMESTER IN WHICH THE TRAUMATIC LOSS OCCURRED; AND
(2) WITH THE APPROVAL OF A SURVIVING PARENT IF THE
STUDENT IS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, MAY BE ACCOMPANIED BY A LETTER
WRITTEN BY THE STUDENT DESCRIBING THE CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE STUDENT’S
TRAUMATIC LOSS AND THE IMPACT ON THE STUDENT’S ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE,
ACHIEVEMENT, OR ATTENDANCE.
(F) ON NOTIFICATION THAT A STUDENT HAS EXPERIENCED A TRAUMATIC
LOSS, A HIGH SCHOOL COUNSELOR SHALL:
(1) INFORM THE STUDENT AND ANY SURVIVING PARENT OF THE
OPTION FOR REQUESTING A TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION ON THE STUDENT’S
OFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT; AND
(2) ADVISE THE STUDENT ON HOW THE TRAUMATIC LOSS NOTATION
MAY BE USED TO EXPLAIN FLUCTUATIONS IN ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE,
ACHIEVEMENT, OR ATTENDANCE.
(G) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.